Washington statutes.
RCW 18.55.085

Unprofessional conduct.

An ocularist or authorized service provider shall explain to patients or customers exactly which type of prosthesis or service they are receiving or purchasing. Failure to do so, or misrepresentation of said services, constitutes unprofessional conduct under this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW.

[ 1991 c 180 s 9.]